Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 4
RELATIONS OF PARTNERS TO EACH
OTHER AND TO PARTNERSHIP

7-64-401. Partner's rights and duties.

Each partner is deemed to have an account that is:

Credited with an amount equal to the money plus the value of any other property, net of the amount of any liabilities, the partner contributes to the partnership and the partner's share of the partnership profits; and

Charged with an amount equal to the money plus the value of any other property, net of the amount of any liabilities, distributed by the partnership to the partner and the partner's share of the partnership losses.

Each partner is entitled to an equal share of the partnership profits and is chargeable with a share of the partnership losses in proportion to the partner's share of the profits.

A partnership shall reimburse a partner for payments made and indemnify a partner for liabilities incurred by the partner in the ordinary course of the business of the partnership or for the preservation of its business or property; provided, however, that such payments were made or liabilities incurred without violation of the partner's duties to the partnership or the other partners.

A partnership shall reimburse a partner for an advance to the partnership beyond the amount of capital the partner agreed to contribute.

A payment or advance made by a partner which gives rise to a partnership obligation under subsection (3) or (4) of this section constitutes a loan to the partnership which accrues interest from the date of the payment or advance.

Each partner has equal rights in the management and conduct of the partnership business.

A partner may use or possess partnership property only on behalf of the partnership.

A partner is not entitled to remuneration for services performed for the partnership except for reasonable compensation for services rendered in winding up the business of the partnership.

A person may become a partner only with the consent of all of the partners.

A difference arising as to a matter in the ordinary course of business of a partnership may be decided by a majority of the partners. An act outside the ordinary course of business of a partnership and an amendment to the partnership agreement may be undertaken only with the consent of all of the partners.

This section does not affect the obligations of a partnership to other persons under section 7-64-301.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 879, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-402. Distributions in kind.

A partner has no right to receive, and may not be required to accept, a distribution in kind.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 881, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-403. Partner's rights and duties with respect to information.

A partnership shall keep its books and records, if any, at its chief executive office.

A partnership shall provide partners and their agents and attorneys access to its books and records. It shall provide former partners and their agents and attorneys access to books and records pertaining to the period during which they were partners. The right of access provides the opportunity to inspect and copy books and records during ordinary business hours. A partnership may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of documents furnished.

Each partner and the partnership shall furnish to a partner, and to the legal representative of a deceased partner or partner under legal disability:

Without demand, any information concerning the partnership's business and affairs reasonably required for the proper exercise of the partner's rights and duties under the partnership agreement or this article; and

On demand, any other information concerning the partnership's business and affairs, except to the extent the demand or the information demanded is unreasonable or otherwise improper under the circumstances.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 881, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-404. General standards of partner's conduct.

The duties a partner owes to the partnership and the other partners, in addition to those established elsewhere in this article, include the duties to:

Account to the partnership and hold as trustee for it any property, profit, or benefit derived by the partner in the conduct or winding up of the partnership business or derived from a use by the partner of partnership property, including the appropriation of a partnership opportunity;

Refrain from dealing with the partnership in the conduct or winding up of the partnership business as or on behalf of a party having an interest adverse to the partnership;

Refrain from competing with the partnership in the conduct of the partnership business before the dissolution of the partnership; and

Comply with the provisions of the partnership agreement.

A partner owes to the partnership and the other partners a duty of care in the conduct and winding up of the partnership business which shall be limited to refraining from engaging in grossly negligent or reckless conduct, intentional misconduct, or a knowing violation of law.

A partner shall discharge the partner's duties to the partnership and the other partners and exercise any rights consistently with the obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

A partner does not violate a duty or obligation to the partnership or the other partners solely because the partner's conduct furthers the partner's own interest.

A partner may lend money to and transact other business with the partnership, and as to each loan or transaction the rights and obligations of the partner may be exercised or performed in the same manner as those of a person who is not a partner, subject to other applicable law.

If a partnership is formed, the duties a partner owes to the partnership and the other partners pertain to all transactions connected with the formation, conduct, or liquidation of the partnership.

This section applies to a person winding up the partnership business as the personal or legal representative of the last surviving partner as if the person were a partner.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 881, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-405. Actions by partnership and partners.

A partnership may maintain an action against a partner for a breach of the partnership agreement, or for the violation of a duty to the partnership, causing harm to the partnership.

A partner may maintain an action against the partnership or another partner for legal or equitable relief, with or without an accounting as to partnership business, to:

Enforce the partner's rights under the partnership agreement;

Enforce the partner's rights under this article, including:

The partner's rights under section 7-64-401, 7-64-403, or 7-64-404;

The partner's right on dissociation to have the partner's interest in the partnership purchased pursuant to section 7-64-701 or enforce any other right under part 6 or part 7 of this article; or

The partner's right to compel a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business under section 7-64-801 or enforce any other right under part 8 of this article; or

Enforce the rights and otherwise protect the interests of the partner, including rights and interests arising independently of the partnership relationship.

The accrual of, and any time limitation on, a right of action for a remedy under this section is governed by other law. A right to an accounting upon a dissolution and winding up does not revive a claim barred by law.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 882, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-406. Continuation of partnership beyond definite term or particular undertaking.

If a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking is continued, without an express agreement, after the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking, the rights and duties of the partners remain the same as they were at the expiration or completion, so far as is consistent with a partnership at will.

If the partners, or those of them who habitually acted in the business during the term or undertaking, continue the business without any settlement or liquidation of the partnership, they are presumed to have agreed that the partnership will continue.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 883, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.